New Jersey, session 221, A483.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 9 of P.L.1977, c.225 (C.34:1A-53) is amended to read as follows: 9.    In the pursuance and promotion of a State policy on tourism, the division, at the direction of the Secretary of State, shall: a.     Provide and promote adequate opportunities for county and municipal participation, federal agency participation, and private citizens' involvement in the decision-making process of tourism planning and policy formulation; b.    Encourage all State, county, and municipal governmental and private agencies to do their utmost to assure the personal safety of residents and tourists both within and without tourist destination areas; c.     Take whatever administrative, litigable, and legislative steps as are necessary to minimize the problems of tourists in not receiving contracted services, including transportation, tours, hotels; d.    Attempt to reconcile and balance the activities and accommodations of the tourist with the daily pursuits and lifestyles of the residents; e.     Develop an understanding among all citizens of the role of tourism in New Jersey, both in terms of its economic and social importance and the problems it presents, through appropriate formal and informal learning experiences; f.     Cooperate with the Department of Education to promote throughout the educational system of New Jersey an awareness of New Jersey history and culture; g.    Ensure that the growth of the tourist industry is consistent with the attainment of economic, social, physical, and environmental objectives in any State plan and county plans that are adopted; h.    Continuously monitor and evaluate the social costs of growth of the tourist industry against the social benefits; i.     Emphasize in the State's tourism promotional efforts the high quality of the State's natural and cultural features; j.     Promote the tourist industry through such activities as Visitors Bureaus and similar county and municipal agencies, and assure that the tourist industry contributes its fair share of the cost of such promotion; k.    Request and receive from any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the State, or any political subdivision or public authority thereof, such assistance and data as may be necessary to enable the division to carry out its responsibilities under this act; l.     In consultation with the council, review annually and, if necessary, revise or update the 10-year master plan developed pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1977, c.225 (C.34:1A-52), and submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature containing an evaluation of the preceding year's activities and developments in tourism and the revisions recommended in the master plan; m.   At the direction of the council, operate the division's Travel and Tourism Cooperative Marketing Campaign Program; [and] n.    Establish and operate the division's Travel and Tourism Advertising and Promotion Program ; and o.    Accept, through the director as an agent of the State of New Jersey, and expend, any gift or grant for any of the purposes of promoting New Jersey as a visitor destination, including the promotion of arts, cultural, entertainment, historical, and tourist and visitor attractions, events, and venues in the State . (cf: P.L.2007, c.253, s.6) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.